Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.67.010

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Board" means the state board for community and technical colleges.

(2) "Costs of training" and "training costs" means the direct costs experienced under a contract with a qualified training institution for formal technical or skill training, including basic skills. "Costs of training" includes amounts in the contract for costs of instruction, materials, equipment, rental of class space, marketing, and overhead. "Costs of training" does not include employee tuition reimbursements unless the tuition reimbursement is specifically included in a contract.

(3) "Participant" means a private employer that, under this chapter, undertakes a training program with a qualified training institution.

(4) "Qualified training institution" means a public community or technical college or a private vocational school licensed by either the workforce training and education coordinating board or the *higher education coordinating board.

(5) "Training allowance" and "allowance" means a voucher, credit, or payment from the board to a participant to cover training costs.

(6) "Training program" means a program funded under this chapter at a qualified training institution.

[ 2006 c 112 s 2.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The higher education coordinating board was abolished by 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 301, effective July 1, 2012.